Utah statutes.
53A-15-603.   Gang prevention and intervention policies.
(1) (a)  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that require a local
school board or governing board of a charter school to enact gang prevention
and intervention policies for all schools within the board's jurisdiction.
(b)  The rules described in Subsection (1)(a) shall provide that the gang
prevention and intervention policies of a local school board or charter school
governing board may include provisions that reflect the individual school
district's or charter school's unique needs or circumstances.
(2)  The rules described in Subsection (1) may include the following
provisions:
(a)  school faculty and personnel shall report suspected gang activities
relating to the school and its students to a school administrator and law
enforcement;
(b)  a student who participates in gang activities may be excluded from
participation in extracurricular activities, including interscholastic
athletics, as determined by the school administration after consultation with
law enforcement;
(c)  gang-related graffiti or damage to school property shall result in parent
or guardian notification and appropriate administrative and law enforcement
actions, which may include obtaining restitution from those responsible for
the damage;
(d)  if a serious gang-related incident, as determined by the school
administrator in consultation with local law enforcement, occurs on school
property, at school related activities, or on a site that is normally
considered to be under school control, notification shall be provided to
parents and guardians of students in the school:
(i)  informing them, in general terms, about the incident, but removing all
personally identifiable information about students from the notice;
(ii)  emphasizing the school's concern for safety; and
(iii)  outlining the action taken at the school regarding the incident;
(e)  school faculty and personnel shall be trained by experienced evidence
based trainers that may include community gang specialists and law enforcement
as part of comprehensive strategies to recognize early warning signs for youth
in trouble and help students resist serious involvement in undesirable
activity, including joining gangs or mimicking gang behavior;
(f)  prohibitions on the following behavior:
(i)  advocating or promoting a gang or any gang-related activities;
(ii)  marking school property, books, or school work with gang names, slogans,
or signs;
(iii)  conducting gang initiations;
(iv)  threatening another person with bodily injury or inflicting bodily
injury on another in connection with a gang or gang-related activity;
(v)  aiding or abetting an activity described under Subsections (1)(f)(i)
through (iv) by a person's presence or support;
(vi)  displaying or wearing common gang apparel, common dress, or identifying
signs or symbols on one's clothing, person, or personal property that is
disruptive to the school environment; and
(vii)  communicating in any method, including verbal, non-verbal, and
electronic means, designed to convey gang membership or affiliation.
(3)  The rules described in Subsection (1) may require a local school board or
governing board of a charter school to publicize the policies enacted by the
local school board or governing board of a charter school in accordance with
the rules described in Subsection (1) to all students, parents, guardians, and
faculty through school websites, handbooks, letters to parents and guardians,
or other reasonable means of communication.
(4)  The State Board of Education may consult with appropriate committees,
including committees that provide opportunities for the input of parents, law
enforcement, and community agencies, as it develops, enacts, and administers
the rules described in Subsection (1).
